District of Columbia statutes.
22-1843

Public posting of human trafficking hotline.

[Not funded].

Oct. 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-239, § 113
as added May 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-276, § 6(b), 62 DCR 479
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-276: Section 10 of D.C. Law 20-276 provided: (a) that § 6(b) of the act, which enacted this section, shall apply upon the date of inclusions of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan; (b) that the Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of the certification; (c) that the Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in the District of Columbia Register; and (d) that the date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the applicability of § 6(b) of the act.